Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1290XS (7) 91 dg/ko S.F. 352 Section 1. Section 237A.13, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 2 thereof the following: 3 5. a. The department shall remit payment to a provider 4 prior to the provider rendering child care to a child enrolled 5 in the state child care assistance program. 6 b. The department shall remit payment on a monthly basis and 7 the payment shall be based on the number of hours a child is 8 scheduled to receive child care from the provider, and not the 9 number of hours a child actually receives child care services 10 from the provider. 11 c. Any copayment a family participating in the state child 12 care assistance program is required to pay as a condition of 13 participation in the state child care assistance program shall 14 be made after the familyâs child receives child care services. 15 Sec. 2. Section 237A.13, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 16 by adding the following new paragraph: 17 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. A temporarily enrolled child under 18 section 237A.15. 19 Sec. 3. Section 237A.13, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 20 following new subsection: 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. State child care assistance benefits 22 for a child enrolled in the state child care assistance program 23 shall not terminate unless all of the following apply: 24 a. The department sent written notification to the childâs 25 family and the childâs child care provider explaining the 26 reasons for terminating the childâs benefits. 27 b. At least thirty calendar days have passed since the date 28 the department sent the written notice required under paragraph 29 âaâ . 30 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 237A.15 Child care assistance ââ 31 temporary enrollment. 32 1. Notwithstanding section 237A.13, subsections 1 and 2, 33 a child shall be temporarily enrolled in the state child care 34 assistance program if all of the following apply: 35 -1- LSB 1290XS (7) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 352 a. The child has at least one sibling that is currently 1 enrolled in the state child care assistance program. 2 b. The provider providing child care to the childâs sibling 3 agreed to provide child care to the child and notified the 4 department of the providerâs agreement. The department shall 5 approve a child as temporarily enrolled in the state child 6 care assistance program within one business day of the date 7 the department received notification, and shall send notice of 8 approval to the provider and the childâs family. 9 c. The childâs family shall have twenty-one calendar days 10 from the date the department approved the childâs temporary 11 enrollment to submit an application to enroll the child in the 12 state child care assistance program under section 237A.13. The 13 department shall have five business days from the date the 14 department receives the application to render a decision on the 15 application. 16 d. A childâs temporary enrollment shall end if the childâs 17 family does not apply for the state child care assistance 18 program under paragraph âcâ , or the department renders a 19 decision on the childâs application for the state child care 20 assistance program. 21 2. Notwithstanding section 237A.13, subsection 5, the 22 department shall remit payment to a provider for child care 23 provided to a temporarily enrolled child within one calendar 24 week of either of the following, whichever occurs earlier: 25 a. Twenty-one calendar days after the date the department 26 approved the childâs temporary enrollment. 27 b. The date the childâs temporary enrollment ends. 28 3. This section shall not be construed to require a provider 29 to provide child care to a child prior to the department 30 approving the child as temporarily enrolled pursuant to 31 subsection 1. 32